Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 6

Multi-County Districts

7-82-601. Creation — Petition.

Utility districts embracing territory in two (2) or more counties may be created in the manner provided in this chapter.

The petition for the incorporation of such utility district may be submitted to the county mayor of any one (1) of the counties situated in whole or in part in such proposed district.

Acts 1955, ch. 275, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 6-2628; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 13, 37.

Attorney General Opinions. Utility districts with territory in more than one county, OAG 00-003, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/6/00).

7-82-602. Commissioners.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B), the commissioners nominated in such petition shall be designated in such a manner that each county situated in whole or in part in the proposed district shall be represented on the board of commissioners by at least one (1) person resident in such county and in the district or owning property within such county and the district, and the county mayor shall appoint commissioners in like manner.

In any county having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand nine hundred (27,900) nor more than twenty-seven thousand nine hundred twenty (27,920), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the commissioners nominated in such petition shall be designated in such a manner that each county situated in whole or in part in the proposed district shall be represented on the board of commissioners by at least one (1) resident of such county and of the district, and the county mayor shall appoint commissioners in like manner.

If the proposed district is to comprise two (2) counties or parts of two (2) counties, the petition shall nominate three (3) commissioners.

If the proposed district is to comprise three (3) or more counties or parts of three (3) or more counties, the petition shall nominate a number of commissioners equal to the number of counties or parts of counties to be included in such district; provided, that where the proposed district is to comprise an even number of counties or parts of counties, up to six (6), the petition shall nominate a number of commissioners equal to the number of counties, plus one (1) commissioner at large.

If the proposed district is to comprise eight (8) or more counties or parts of counties, the petition shall nominate eight (8) residents of the district, and it shall not be necessary for each county to be represented on the board; however, each of the eight (8) commissioners shall be from separate counties, it being the purpose and intent of this subdivision (a)(2)(C) to limit the number of commissioners of any district to eight (8). Any existing districts with seven (7) commissioners serving districts comprised of more than seven (7) counties or parts of seven (7) counties shall add a qualified commissioner from the county having the largest number of district customers among those counties not already having a commissioner.

Any commissioner added pursuant to subdivision (a)(2)(C)(i) to existing utility districts shall be made utilizing the applicable procedures described in § 7-82-307. The term for the added commissioner shall be four (4) years beginning July 12, 2016. The first certified list of nominees shall be submitted to the appropriate county mayor no later than May 1, 2016.

In districts comprising seven (7) or more counties or parts of counties, the commissioners shall be entitled to receive compensation for their services in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day's attendance of the meetings of the board in the performance of their official duties. The amount of compensation shall be fixed by the board of commissioners, but the compensation shall not exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) per day. No member of a board of commissioners shall draw compensation in excess of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) for such services during any one (1) calendar year.

In natural gas districts serving counties with a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand one hundred (29,100) nor more than twenty-nine thousand four hundred (29,400) and not less than thirty-three thousand ten (33,010) nor more than thirty-three thousand five hundred (33,500), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, there shall be five (5) commissioners. Each county shall be represented by at least two (2) commissioners.

Acts 1955, ch. 275, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 6-2629; Acts 1980, ch. 794, § 1; 1987, ch. 162, §§ 1, 3; 1993, ch. 154, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2015, ch. 452, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(2), which read: “If the proposed district is to comprise two (2) counties or parts of two (2) counties, the petition shall nominate three (3) commissioners. If the proposed district is to comprise three (3) or more counties or parts of three (3) or more counties, the petition shall nominate a number of commissioners equal to the number of counties or parts of counties to be included in such district; provided, that where the proposed district is to comprise an even number of counties, or parts of counties, the petition shall nominate a number of commissioners equal to the number of counties, plus one (1) commissioner at large. If the proposed district is to comprise seven (7) or more counties or parts of counties, the petition shall nominate seven (7) residents of the district, and it shall not be necessary for each county to be represented on the board; however, each of the seven (7) commissioners shall be from separate counties, it being the purpose and intent of this subdivision (a)(2) to limit the number of commissioners of any district to seven (7).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 452, § 2. May 18, 2015.

Cross-References. Waiver of provisions, §7-82-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-603. Hearing on incorporation — Notice — Address of district office.

The notice of public hearing on the convenience and necessity of the incorporation of the district shall be published, as provided in § 7-82-202, in each of the counties situated in whole or in part in such proposed district in a newspaper published and having a general circulation in the counties. If there is no such newspaper in any of such counties, notice shall be given in such county or counties by posting, as provided in § 7-82-202. Such notice shall also be given by registered mail at least ten (10) days before the hearing to the county mayor of each county situated in whole or in part within such proposed district, and to the mayor or chief executive officer of each city, town and utility district, as provided in § 7-82-202.

The petition for the incorporation of such utility district, the notice of public hearing on the petition, and the order creating such district, in addition to other requirements of this chapter, shall state the address of the principal office of such utility district.

The public hearing shall be held before the county mayors of such counties sitting as a panel, at a time and place designated by the county mayor to whom the petition for the proposed district was addressed. All such county mayors shall be notified of the date, time and place of such hearing at least five (5) days prior to the date, and it shall be the responsibility of such county mayors to attend and participate if they elect to do so in such hearing. In the event a majority of such county mayors so notified fail to appear and participate in the hearing, the county mayor to whom the petition was addressed may proceed with the hearing and enter appropriate orders as provided in this chapter. In the event three (3) or more counties are involved and in the event two (2) or more of such county mayors elect to attend and participate in the hearing, a majority vote shall be required for the creation of the district.

Acts 1955, ch. 275, § 1; 1968, ch. 529, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 6-2630; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Multi-county gas utility districts, OAG 93-56, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (9/2/93).

7-82-604. Terms of commissioners.

In cases where more than three (3) commissioners are nominated under this chapter, such commissioners shall be appointed for terms of two (2), three (3) and four (4) years, the number of commissioners appointed for each such term to be as nearly equal as possible.

Acts 1955, ch. 275, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-2631.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-605. Filing and publication of order creating district.

A certified copy of the order creating such district shall be filed with the county clerk of each of the counties included in whole or in part in such district and shall be entered of record. A copy of such order shall also be published in each of the counties situated in whole or in part within such district in a newspaper published and having a general circulation in such county, or if there is no such newspaper in any such county, a copy of the order shall be posted in five (5) conspicuous public places within such county. A certified copy of such order shall also be filed with the secretary of state. Upon such filing and publication or posting, the incorporation of such district shall be complete.

Acts 1955, ch. 275, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 6-2632.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-606. Appeals from order creating district.

Appeals from an order creating such a district may be prayed as provided in this chapter to the circuit court of any county included in whole or in part in such district.

Acts 1955, ch. 275, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-2633.

Cross-References. Appeal to circuit court, §7-82-204.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-607. Vacancies in board.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the office of any commissioner, other than a commissioner at large, shall become vacant if the incumbent ceases to reside in or be a district customer in the county from which the commissioner was elected.

In any county having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand nine hundred (27,900) nor more than twenty-seven thousand nine hundred twenty (27,920), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the office of any commissioner, other than a commissioner at large, shall become vacant if the incumbent ceases to reside in the county from which the incumbent was elected.

Acts 1955, ch. 275, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-2634; Acts 1987, ch. 162, §§ 2, 3; 2006, ch. 512, § 1; 2010, ch. 1146, §§ 11, 12; 2012, ch. 538, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2010, ch. 1146, § 13 provided that, notwithstanding §8-48-101, the office of a district commissioner will not be vacated on June 30, 2010, solely because the district commissioner is not a district resident or customer and the district commissioner may continue in office until the expiration of such commissioner's term of office in effect on June 30, 2010.

Cross-References. Waiver of provisions, §7-82-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-608. Financial statements.

Statements published pursuant to §7-82-401 shall be published in each of the counties situated in whole or in part in such district in a newspaper having general circulation in the counties.

Acts 1955, ch. 275, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-2635.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-609. Part not retroactive.

It is expressly the legislative intent that nothing in this part shall be construed to be retroactive, and that the terms and conditions of such sections shall in no wise affect or abridge the rights, powers, privileges and duties of utility districts existing on March 21, 1955.

Acts 1955, ch. 275, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-2636.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Utility districts with territory in more than one county, OAG 00-003, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/6/00).